test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vaddu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - váddu: # ok LAAVU
    váddu+N+Sg+Nom:  váddu
    váddu+N+Sg+Gen:  váádu
    váddu+N+Sg+Acc:  váádu
    váddu+N+Sg+Ill:  váádun
    váddu+N+Sg+Loc:  váádust
    váddu+N+Sg+Com:  váddoin
    váddu+N+Sg+Abe:  váduttáá
    váddu+N+Ess:  váddun
    váddu+N+Par:  váddud
    váddu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááduh
    váddu+N+Pl+Gen: [váádui, vádui]
    váddu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááduid
    váddu+N+Pl+Ill:  váddoid
    váddu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááduin
    váddu+N+Pl+Com:  [váduiguin, váduigijn]
    váddu+N+Pl+Abe:  váduittáá

  Noun - nággu: # ok LAAVU
    nággu+N+Sg+Nom:  nággu
    nággu+N+Sg+Gen:  náágu
    nággu+N+Sg+Acc:  náágu
    nággu+N+Sg+Ill:  náágun
    nággu+N+Sg+Loc:  náágust
    nággu+N+Sg+Com:  nággoin
    nággu+N+Sg+Abe:  náguttáá
    nággu+N+Ess:  nággun
    nággu+N+Par:  nággud
    nággu+N+Pl+Nom:  nááguh
    nággu+N+Pl+Gen: [náágui, nágui]
    nággu+N+Pl+Acc:  nááguid
    nággu+N+Pl+Ill:  nággoid
    nággu+N+Pl+Loc:  nááguin
    nággu+N+Pl+Com:  [náguiguin, náguigijn]
    nággu+N+Pl+Abe:  náguittáá

  Noun - táppu: # ok LAAVU
    táppu+N+Sg+Nom:  táppu
    táppu+N+Sg+Gen:  táápu
    táppu+N+Sg+Acc:  táápu
    táppu+N+Sg+Ill:  táápun
    táppu+N+Sg+Loc:  táápust
    táppu+N+Sg+Com:  táppoin
    táppu+N+Sg+Abe:  táputtáá
    táppu+N+Ess:  táppun
    táppu+N+Par:  táppud
    táppu+N+Pl+Nom:  táápuh
    táppu+N+Pl+Gen: [táápui, tápui]
    táppu+N+Pl+Acc:  táápuid
    táppu+N+Pl+Ill:  táppoid
    táppu+N+Pl+Loc:  táápuin
    táppu+N+Pl+Com:  [tápuiguin, tápuigijn]
    táppu+N+Pl+Abe:  tápuittáá

  Noun - káttu: # ok LAAVU
    káttu+N+Sg+Nom:  káttu
    káttu+N+Sg+Gen:  káátu
    káttu+N+Sg+Acc:  káátu
    káttu+N+Sg+Ill:  káátun
    káttu+N+Sg+Loc:  káátust
    káttu+N+Sg+Com:  káttoin
    káttu+N+Sg+Abe:  kátuttáá
    káttu+N+Ess:  káttun
    káttu+N+Par:  káttud
    káttu+N+Pl+Nom:  káátuh
    káttu+N+Pl+Gen: [káátui, kátui]
    káttu+N+Pl+Acc:  káátuid
    káttu+N+Pl+Ill:  káttoid
    káttu+N+Pl+Loc:  káátuin
    káttu+N+Pl+Com:  [kátuiguin, kátuigijn]
    káttu+N+Pl+Abe:  kátuittáá

  Noun - táttu: # ok LAAVU
    táttu+N+Sg+Nom:  táttu
    táttu+N+Sg+Gen:  táátu
    táttu+N+Sg+Acc:  táátu
    táttu+N+Sg+Ill:  táátun
    táttu+N+Sg+Loc:  táátust
    táttu+N+Sg+Com:  táttoin
    táttu+N+Sg+Abe:  tátuttáá
    táttu+N+Ess:  táttun
    táttu+N+Par:  táttud
    táttu+N+Pl+Nom:  táátuh
    táttu+N+Pl+Gen: [táátui, tátui]
    táttu+N+Pl+Acc:  táátuid
    táttu+N+Pl+Ill:  táttoid
    táttu+N+Pl+Loc:  táátuin
    táttu+N+Pl+Com:  [tátuiguin, tátuigijn]
    táttu+N+Pl+Abe:  tátuittáá

  Noun - cuoppâ:
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuoppâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuopân
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuopâst
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Com: cuoppáin
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuopâttáá
    cuoppâ+N+Ess: cuoppân
    cuoppâ+N+Par: cuoppâd
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuopah
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Gen: cuopâi
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuopâid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuoppáid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuopâin
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Com: [cuopâiguin, cuopâigijn]
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuopâittáá

  Noun - ruossâ:
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruossâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruosân
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruosâst
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Com: ruossáin
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruosâttáá
    ruossâ+N+Ess: ruossân
    ruossâ+N+Par: ruossâd
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruosah
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Gen: ruosâi
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruosâid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruossáid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruosâin
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Com: [ruosâiguin, ruosâigijn]
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruosâittáá

  Noun - cuozzâ:
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuozzâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuozân
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuozâst
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Com: cuozzáin
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuozâttáá
    cuozzâ+N+Ess: cuozzân
    cuozzâ+N+Par: cuozzâd
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuozah
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Gen: cuozâi
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuozâid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuozzáid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuozâin
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Com: [cuozâiguin, cuozâigijn]
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuozâittáá

  Noun - ristâ:
    ristâ+N+Sg+Nom: ristâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Gen: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Acc: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Ill: riistân
    ristâ+N+Sg+Loc: riistâst
    ristâ+N+Sg+Com: ristáin
    ristâ+N+Sg+Abe: ristâttáá
    ristâ+N+Ess: ristân
    ristâ+N+Par: ristâd
    ristâ+N+Pl+Nom: riistah
    ristâ+N+Pl+Gen: [riistâi, ristâi]
    ristâ+N+Pl+Acc: riistâid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Ill: ristáid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Loc: riistâin
    ristâ+N+Pl+Com: [ristâiguin, ristâigijn]
    ristâ+N+Pl+Abe: ristâittáá

  Noun - kolbâ:
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Nom: kolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Gen: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Acc: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Ill: koolbân
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Loc: koolbâst
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Com: kolbáin
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Abe: kolbâttáá
    kolbâ+N+Ess: kolbân
    kolbâ+N+Par: kolbâd
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Nom: koolbah
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koolbâi, kolbâi]
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Acc: koolbâid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Ill: kolbáid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Loc: koolbâin
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Com: [kolbâiguin, kolbâigijn]
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Abe: kolbâittáá

  Noun - muršâ:
    muršâ+N+Sg+Nom: muršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Gen: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Acc: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Ill: muuršân
    muršâ+N+Sg+Loc: muuršâst
    muršâ+N+Sg+Com: muršáin
    muršâ+N+Sg+Abe: muršâttáá
    muršâ+N+Ess: muršân
    muršâ+N+Par: muršâd
    muršâ+N+Pl+Nom: muuršah
    muršâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muuršâi, muršâi]
    muršâ+N+Pl+Acc: muuršâid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Ill: muršáid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Loc: muuršâin
    muršâ+N+Pl+Com: [muršâiguin, muršâigijn]
    muršâ+N+Pl+Abe: muršâittáá

  Noun - rytmâ:
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Nom: rytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Gen: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Acc: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Ill: ryytmân
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Loc: ryytmâst
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Com: rytmáin
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Abe: rytmâttáá
    rytmâ+N+Ess: rytmân
    rytmâ+N+Par: rytmâd
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Nom: ryytmah
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ryytmâi, rytmâi]
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Acc: ryytmâid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Ill: rytmáid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Loc: ryytmâin
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Com: [rytmâiguin, rytmâigijn]
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Abe: rytmâittáá
    
  Noun - kállu: # ok KALLU
    kállu+N+Sg+Nom:  kállu
    kállu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálu
    kállu+N+Sg+Acc:  káálu
    kállu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálun
    kállu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálust
    kállu+N+Sg+Com:  kálloin
    kállu+N+Sg+Abe:  káluttáá
    kállu+N+Ess:  kállun
    kállu+N+Par:  kállud
    kállu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááluh
    kállu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálui, kálui]
    kállu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááluid
    kállu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálloid
    kállu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááluin
    kállu+N+Pl+Com:  [káluiguin, káluigijn]
    kállu+N+Pl+Abe:  káluittáá

  Noun - pánnu: # ok KALLU
    pánnu+N+Sg+Nom:  pánnu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Gen:  páánu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Acc:  páánu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Ill:  páánun
    pánnu+N+Sg+Loc:  páánust
    pánnu+N+Sg+Com:  pánnoin
    pánnu+N+Sg+Abe:  pánuttáá
    pánnu+N+Ess:  pánnun
    pánnu+N+Par:  pánnud
    pánnu+N+Pl+Nom:  páánuh
    pánnu+N+Pl+Gen: [páánui, pánui]
    pánnu+N+Pl+Acc:  páánuid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Ill:  pánnoid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Loc:  páánuin
    pánnu+N+Pl+Com:  [pánuiguin, pánuigijn]
    pánnu+N+Pl+Abe:  pánuittáá

  Noun - muállu: # ok VUAGGU
    muállu+N+Sg+Nom:  muállu
    muállu+N+Sg+Gen:  muálu
    muállu+N+Sg+Acc:  muálu
    muállu+N+Sg+Ill:  muálun
    muállu+N+Sg+Loc:  muálust
    muállu+N+Sg+Com:  muálloin
    muállu+N+Sg+Abe:  muáluttáá
    muállu+N+Ess:  muállun
    muállu+N+Par:  muállud
    muállu+N+Pl+Nom:  muáluh
    muállu+N+Pl+Gen:  muálui
    muállu+N+Pl+Acc:  muáluid
    muállu+N+Pl+Ill:  muálloid
    muállu+N+Pl+Loc:  muáluin
    muállu+N+Pl+Com:  [muáluiguin, muáluigijn]
    muállu+N+Pl+Abe:  muáluittáá

  Noun - puállu: # ok KALLU
    puállu+N+Sg+Nom:  puállu
    puállu+N+Sg+Gen:  puálu
    puállu+N+Sg+Acc:  puálu
    puállu+N+Sg+Ill:  puálun
    puállu+N+Sg+Loc:  puálust
    puállu+N+Sg+Com:  puálloin
    puállu+N+Sg+Abe:  puáluttáá
    puállu+N+Ess:  puállun
    puállu+N+Par:  puállud
    puállu+N+Pl+Nom:  puáluh
    puállu+N+Pl+Gen:  puálui
    puállu+N+Pl+Acc:  puáluid
    puállu+N+Pl+Ill:  puálloid
    puállu+N+Pl+Loc:  puáluin
    puállu+N+Pl+Com:  [puáluiguin, puáluigijn]
    puállu+N+Pl+Abe:  puáluittáá

  Noun - máksu: # ok; SgCom + PlIll cehcked with Ilmari Mattus; IM: vs; MLO:    	vss; both are in use LAAVU
    máksu+N+Sg+Nom:  máksu
    máksu+N+Sg+Gen:  máávsu
    máksu+N+Sg+Acc:  máávsu
    máksu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááksun
    máksu+N+Sg+Loc:  máávsust
    máksu+N+Sg+Com:  [mávssoin, mávsoin]
    máksu+N+Sg+Abe:  mávsuttáá
    máksu+N+Ess:  máksun
    máksu+N+Par:  máksud
    máksu+N+Pl+Nom:  máávsuh
    máksu+N+Pl+Gen: [máávsui, mávsui]
    máksu+N+Pl+Acc:  máávsuid
    máksu+N+Pl+Ill:  [mávssoid, mávsoid]
    máksu+N+Pl+Loc:  máávsuin
    máksu+N+Pl+Com:  [mávsuiguin, mávsuigijn]
    máksu+N+Pl+Abe:  mávsuittáá

  Noun - riätká:
    riätká+N+Sg+Nom:  riätká
    riätká+N+Sg+Gen:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Acc:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Ill:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Sg+Loc:  riäđhást
    riätká+N+Sg+Com:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Sg+Abe:  riäđháttáá
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Par:  riätkád
    riätká+N+Pl+Nom:  riäđháh
    riätká+N+Pl+Gen: riäđhái
    riätká+N+Pl+Acc:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Ill:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Loc:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Pl+Com:  [riäđháiguin, riäđháigijn]
    riätká+N+Pl+Abe:  riäđháittáá

  Noun - ákku: # ok PUDDA
    ákku+N+Sg+Nom:  ákku
    ákku+N+Sg+Gen:  ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Acc:  ááhu
    ákku+N+Sg+Ill:  áákun
    ákku+N+Sg+Loc:  ááhust
    ákku+N+Sg+Com:  áhhoin
    ákku+N+Sg+Abe:  áhuttáá
    ákku+N+Ess:  ákkun
    ákku+N+Par:  ákkud
    ákku+N+Pl+Nom:  ááhuh
    ákku+N+Pl+Gen: [ááhui, áhui]
    ákku+N+Pl+Acc:  ááhuid
    ákku+N+Pl+Ill:  áhhoid
    ákku+N+Pl+Loc:  ááhuin
    ákku+N+Pl+Com:  [áhuiguin, áhuigijn]
    ákku+N+Pl+Abe:  áhuittáá

  Noun - puddâ:
    puddâ+N+Sg+Nom: puddâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Gen: puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Acc: puudâ
    puddâ+N+Sg+Ill: puudân
    puddâ+N+Sg+Loc: puudâst
    puddâ+N+Sg+Com: puddáin
    puddâ+N+Sg+Abe: pudâttáá
    puddâ+N+Ess: puddân
    puddâ+N+Par: puddâd
    puddâ+N+Pl+Nom: puudah
    puddâ+N+Pl+Acc: [puudâi, pudâi]
    puddâ+N+Pl+Acc: puudâid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Ill: puddáid
    puddâ+N+Pl+Loc: puudâin
    puddâ+N+Pl+Com: [pudâiguin, pudâigijn]
    puddâ+N+Pl+Abe: pudâittáá

  Noun - roppâ:
    roppâ+N+Sg+Nom: roppâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Gen: roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Acc: roopâ
    roppâ+N+Sg+Ill: roopân
    roppâ+N+Sg+Loc: roopâst
    roppâ+N+Sg+Com: roppáin
    roppâ+N+Sg+Abe: ropâttáá
    roppâ+N+Ess: roppân
    roppâ+N+Par: roppâd
    roppâ+N+Pl+Nom: roopah
    roppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roopâi, ropâi]
    roppâ+N+Pl+Acc: roopâid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Ill: roppáid
    roppâ+N+Pl+Loc: roopâin
    roppâ+N+Pl+Com: [ropâiguin, ropâigijn]
    roppâ+N+Pl+Abe: ropâittáá

  Noun - rippâ:
    rippâ+N+Sg+Nom: rippâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Gen: riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Acc: riipâ
    rippâ+N+Sg+Ill: riipân
    rippâ+N+Sg+Loc: riipâst
    rippâ+N+Sg+Com: rippáin
    rippâ+N+Sg+Abe: ripâttáá
    rippâ+N+Ess: rippân
    rippâ+N+Par: rippâd
    rippâ+N+Pl+Nom: riipah
    rippâ+N+Pl+Gen: [riipâi, ripâi]
    rippâ+N+Pl+Acc: riipâid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Ill: rippáid
    rippâ+N+Pl+Loc: riipâin
    rippâ+N+Pl+Com: [ripâiguin, ripâigijn]
    rippâ+N+Pl+Abe: ripâittáá

  Noun - lekkâ:
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Nom: lekkâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Gen: leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Acc: leehâ
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Ill: leekân
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Loc: leehâst
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Com: lehháin
    lekkâ+N+Sg+Abe: lehâttáá
    lekkâ+N+Ess: lekkân
    lekkâ+N+Par: lekkâd
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Nom: leehah
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [leehâi, lehâi]
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Acc: leehâid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Ill: lehháid
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Loc: leehâin
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Com: [lehâiguin, lehâigijn]
    lekkâ+N+Pl+Abe: lehâittáá
